public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
PFX $ N 62
PFX $ 0 X      [LC]
PFX $ 0 L      X
PFX $ 0 C      [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 CX     [LC]
PFX $ 0 CL     X
PFX $ 0 CC     [XLC]
PFX $ 0 CCX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCL    X
PFX $ 0 CCC    [XL]
PFX $ 0 CCCX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 CCCL   X
PFX $ 0 CD     [XL]
PFX $ 0 CDX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 CDL    X
PFX $ 0 D      [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DX     [LC]
PFX $ 0 DL     X
PFX $ 0 DC     [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCL    X
PFX $ 0 DCC    [XLC]
PFX $ 0 DCCX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCL   X
PFX $ 0 DCCC   [XL]
PFX $ 0 DCCCX  [LC]
PFX $ 0 DCCCL  X
PFX $ 0 CM     [XL]
PFX $ 0 CMX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 CML    X
PFX $ 0 M      [XLCDM]
PFX $ 0 MX     [LC]
PFX $ 0 ML     X
PFX $ 0 MC     [XLCMD]
PFX $ 0 MCX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCL    X
PFX $ 0 MCC    [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MCCX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCCL   X
PFX $ 0 MCCC   [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCCCX  [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCCCL  X
PFX $ 0 MCD    [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCDX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCDL   X
PFX $ 0 MD     [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDL    X
PFX $ 0 MDC    [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCL   X
PFX $ 0 MDCC   [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCX  [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCL  X
PFX $ 0 MDCCC  [XL]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCX [LC]
PFX $ 0 MDCCCL X
PFX $ 0 MCM    [XL]
PFX $ 0 MCMX   [LC]
PFX $ 0 MCML   X
PFX $ 0 MM     [XLC]
PFX $ 0 MMX    [LC]
PFX $ 0 MML    X

# đorni de la setemana
# dict: Luni
# dict: Marti
# dict: Mèrkore
# dict: Mèrkol
# dict: Điòba
# dict: Đòbia
# dict: Đoba
# dict: Đobia
# dict: Vénare
# dict: Véndre
# dict: Véndri
# dict: Véner
# dict: Vénere
# dict: Sabo
# dict: Doménega

# mexi
# dict: Đenaro
# dict: Đanèr
# dict: Đenèr
# dict: Febraro
# dict: Fevraro
# dict: Fevrèr
# dict: Marŧo
# dict: Aprile
# dict: Avril
# dict: Mađo
# dict: Majo
# dict: Đuño
# dict: Junio
# dict: Lujo
# dict: Lulio
# dict: Agosto
# dict: Seténbre
# dict: Seténbare
# dict: Otóbre
# dict: Otóbare
# dict: Novénbre
# dict: Novénbare
# dict: Dexénbre
# dict: Dexénbare

# staxon (ant. saxon)
# dict: Primavera
# dict: Primaverta
# dict: Vèrta
# dict: Insuta
# dict: Ansuda
# dict: Istà
# dict: Autuno
# dict: Otuno
# dict: Fardima
# dict: Invèrno

# đonture koordenanti
# dict: né
# dict: néke
# dict: ní
# dict: ñanka
# dict: anka
# dict: oltre
# dict: pitòst
# dict: pitòsto
# dict: altrimenti
# dict: ma
# dict: anŧi
# dict: inveŧe
# dict: defati
# dict: parké
# dict: parò
# dict: anpò
# dict: siben
# dict: donka
# dict: adonka
# dict: alora
# dict: insoma
# dict: kusí
# dict: kusíta
# dict: kuindi
# dict: sia
# dict: kome
# dict: fà
# dict: kofà
# dict: tant/B

# đonture subordenanti
# dict: de
# dict: parkome
# dict: sikome
# dict: sí
# dict: almanko
# dict: finké
# dict: mentre
# dict: pena
# dict: intanto
# dict: kó
# dict: vanti
# dict: drio
# dict: man
# dict: kondiŧion
# dict: pato
# dict: basta
# dict: kaxo
# dict: kaxomài
# dict: nò
# dict: kuaxi
# dict: skuaxi
# dict: fora
# dict: via
# dict: senŧa

# esklamaŧion
# dict: ah
# dict: aah
# dict: eh
# dict: ehh
# dict: ih
# dict: oh
# dict: ohh
# dict: uh
# dict: ahi
# dict: ehi
# dict: ufa
# dict: òhu
# dict: òhi
# dict: ohi
# dict: ohe
# dict: ohé
# dict: ohu
# dict: bah
# dict: cò
# dict: mah
# dict: ehm
# dict: uhm
# dict: mh
# dict: ssh
# dict: ha
# dict: ho
# dict: òco
# dict: èko
# dict: brao
# dict: bravo
# dict: fòrŧa
# dict: korajo
# dict: ben
# dict: benon
# dict: basta
# dict: viva
# dict: a
# dict: pò
# dict: mò
# dict: vara
# dict: ‘ara
# dict: tarà
# dict: mostro
# dict: bèlo
# dict: mixèria
# dict: òro
# dict: viva
# dict: brr
# dict: malani
# dict: guài
# dict: fiol
# dict: fiòl
# dict: kan
# dict: magari
# dict: cao
# dict: sani
# dict: sanité
# dict: salve
# dict: pòro/B
# dict: mona
# dict: din
# dict: don
# dict: tik
# dict: tak
# dict: patapúnfete
# dict: pàfete
# dict: cik
# dict: cak
# dict: ñao
# dict: kikirikí




# TODO
# pàx. 119


#SFX Y N 12
#SFX Y o emente [lu]ento
#SFX Y o amente [^t]o
#SFX Y o amente [^n]to
#SFX Y o amente [^e]nto
#SFX Y o amente [^lu]ento
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^rln]e
#SFX Y e mente  [aeiou]re
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^aeiou]re
#SFX Y e mente  [^l]le
#SFX Y 0 mente  lle
#SFX Y e amente one
#SFX Y 0 mente  [^o]ne-
